Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-712.09
Violation; penalty.

Any official who shall violate the provisions of sections 84-712, 84-712.01, and 84-712.03 to 84-712.08 shall be subject to removal or impeachment and in addition shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1979, LB 86, § 10.